Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.360

Report to the legislature.

By January 1st of every odd-numbered year, the commission shall provide a written report to the legislature addressing the following items: (1) Status and satisfaction of service to its clients; (2) detailed analysis of how it will maintain and update adequate state-of-the-art training models and their delivery in the most cost-effective and efficient manner; and (3) fiscal data projecting its current and future funding requirements.

[ 1997 c 351 s 11.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1997 c 351: See notes following RCW 43.101.200.